Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2362.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 33-1902, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-1902. Residential rental property; recording with the assessor; agent designation; civil penalty; fee A. An owner of residential rental property shall maintain with the assessor in the county where the property is located information required by this section in a manner to be determined by the assessor.  The owner shall update any information required by this section within ten days after a change in the information occurs.  The following information shall be maintained: 1. The name, address and telephone number of the property owner. 2. If the property is owned by a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, trust or real estate investment trust, the name, address and telephone number of any of the following: (a) For a corporation, a corporate officer. (b) For a partnership, a general partner. (c) For a limited liability company, the managing or administrative member. (d) For a limited partnership, a general partner. (e) For a trust, a trustee. (f) For a real estate investment trust, a general partner or an officer. 3. The street address and parcel number of the property. 4. The year the building was built. 5. if the property is rented for periods of less than thirty days. B. An owner of residential rental property who lives outside this state shall designate and record with the assessor a statutory agent who lives in this state and who will accept legal service on behalf of the owner.  The owner shall designate the agent in a manner to be determined by the assessor. The information shall include the name, address and telephone number of the agent. C. Residential rental property shall not be occupied if the information required by this section is not on file with the county assessor. If the owner has not filed the information required by this section with the county assessor and the residential rental property is occupied by a tenant and the tenant chooses to terminate the tenancy, the tenant shall deliver to the landlord, owner or managing agent of the property a written ten day days' notice to comply with this section.  The notice shall be delivered by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by hand delivery. If the owner does not comply with this section within ten days after receipt of receiving the notice, the tenant may terminate the rental agreement and the landlord shall return all prepaid rent to the tenant. Security deposits shall be returned in accordance with section 33-1321, subsection D. The landlord shall return those monies by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by hand delivery to the tenant within ten days after the termination of the rental agreement. This subsection applies to any existing lease and to any new lease after August 25, 2004. Notwithstanding this subsection, an owner is in compliance with this subsection only if the owner had filed the information required by subsection A of this section with the county assessor. D. All records, files and documents that are required by this section are public records. E. For residential rental property that is acquired by an owner after the date of the notice of assessed valuation and the notice prescribed by section 42-15103 and until the issuance of the next notice of assessed valuation, a city or town shall assess a civil penalty of one thousand dollars $1,000 against a person who fails to comply with this section, plus an additional one hundred dollars $100 for each month after the date of the original violation until compliance occurs.  The court shall not suspend any portion of the civil penalty provided by this subsection. F. Notwithstanding subsection E of this section, if a person complies within ten days after receiving the complaint that notices the violation, the court shall dismiss the complaint and shall not impose a civil penalty. G. Except for newly acquired residential rental property as prescribed by subsection E of this section, if a residential rental property owner fails to register with the county assessor as prescribed by this section, the city or town may impose a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars per day $150 for each day of violation after the date of the most recent notice of assessed valuation and the notice prescribed by section 42-15103.  If a person complies within ten days after receiving the notice from the county assessor, the court shall dismiss the complaint and shall not impose a civil penalty. H. In carrying out this section, the county assessor shall have immunity as provided in section 12-820.01. I. The county assessor may assess a fee of not more than ten dollars $10 for each initial registration and each change of information in the registry. J. On request from a city or town the county assessor shall provide the most current list of all registered rental property owners within the city's or town's boundaries. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 42-12001, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12001. Class one property For the purposes of taxation, class one is established consisting of the following subclasses: 1. Producing mines and mining claims, personal property used on mines and mining claims, improvements to mines and mining claims and mills and smelters operated in conjunction with mines and mining claims that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14053. 2. Standing timber that is valued at full cash value. 3. Real and personal property of gas distribution companies, electric transmission companies, electric distribution companies, combination gas and electric transmission and distribution companies, and companies engaged in the generation of generating electricity that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14151. 4. Real and personal property of airport fuel delivery companies that are valued pursuant to section 42-14503. 5. Real and personal property that is used by producing oil, gas and geothermal resource interests that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14102. 6. Real and personal property of water, sewer and wastewater utility companies that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14151. 7. Real and personal property of pipeline companies that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14201. 8. Real and personal property of shopping centers that are valued at full cash value or pursuant to chapter 13, article 5 of this title, as applicable, other than property that is included in class nine. 9. Real and personal property of golf courses that are valued at full cash value or pursuant to chapter 13, article 4 of this title. 10. All property, both real and personal, of manufacturers, assemblers or fabricators, other than property that is specifically included in another class described in this article, that is valued under this title. 11. Real and personal property that is used in communications transmission facilities and that provides public telephone or telecommunications exchange or interexchange access for compensation to effect two-way communication to, from, through or within this state. 12. Real property and improvements that are devoted to any other commercial or industrial use, other than property that is specifically included in another class described in this article, and that are valued at full cash value. 13. Personal property that is devoted to any other commercial or industrial use, other than property that is specifically included in another class described in this article, and that is valued at full cash value. 14. Real and personal property of electric cooperatives that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14159. 15. Real and personal property and improvements that are rented to lodgers for periods of less than thirty days for a total of more than one hundred eighty days in a calendar year and that are valued at full cash value, except: (a) Property that is occupied by the owner of the property as the owner's primary residence that is included in class three. (b) Property for residential purposes that is rented and that is included in class four. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 42-12004, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12004. Class four property A. For the purposes of taxation, class four is established consisting of: 1. Real and personal property and improvements to the property that are used for residential purposes, including residential property that is owned in foreclosure by a financial institution, that is not otherwise included in another classification and that is valued at full cash value.  The homesite that is included in class four may include: (a) Up to ten acres on a single parcel of real property on which the residential improvement is located. (b) More than ten, but not more than forty, acres on a single parcel of real property on which the residential improvement is located if it is zoned exclusively for residential purposes or contains legal restrictions or physical conditions that prevent the division of the parcel. For the purposes of this subdivision, "physical conditions" means topography, mountains, washes, rivers, roads or any other configuration that limits the residential usable land area. 2. Real and personal property and improvements to the property that are used for residential purposes and solely leased or rented, that are not included in class one, two, three, six, seven or eight and that are valued at full cash value. 3. Child care facilities that are licensed under title 36, chapter 7.1 and that are valued at full cash value. 4. Real and personal property and improvements to property that are used to operate nonprofit residential housing facilities that are structured to house or care for persons with disabilities or who are at least sixty-two years of age and that are valued at full cash value. 5. Real and personal property and improvements that are used to operate licensed residential care institutions or licensed nursing care institutions that provide medical services, nursing services or health-related services and that are structured to house or care for persons with disabilities or who are at least sixty-two years of age and that are valued at full cash value. 6. Real and personal property consisting of not more than eight rooms of residential property that are leased or rented to transient lodgers, together with furnishing not more than a breakfast meal, by the owner who resides on the property and that is valued at full cash value. 7. Real and personal property that consists of residential dwellings maintained for occupancy by agricultural employees as a condition of employment or as a convenience to the employer, that is not included in class three and that is valued at full cash value. The land associated with these dwellings shall be valued as agricultural land pursuant to chapter 13, article 3 of this title. 8. Real property and improvements to property constituting common areas that are valued pursuant to chapter 13, article 9 of this title. 9. Real and personal property that is defined as timeshare property by section 32-2197 and valued pursuant to chapter 13, article 10 of this title, except for any property used for commercial, industrial or transient occupancy purposes and included in class one to the extent of that use. 10. Real and personal property and improvements that are used for residential purposes, and that are leased or is rented to lodgers for periods of less than thirty days for a total of one hundred eighty days or less in a calendar year and that are valued at full cash value, except for: (a) Property that is occupied by the owner of the property as the owner's primary residence and that is included in class three. (b) Property that is used for commercial purposes and that is included in class one pursuant to section 42-12001, paragraph 15. 11. Low-income multifamily residential rental properties that are valued pursuant to chapter 13, article 13 of this title. 12. Real and personal property and improvements to property of a guest ranch that meets the requirements prescribed in chapter 13, article 12 of this title and that is included in the Arizona dude ranch heritage trail program established by section 41-867 and that are valued at full cash value. B. Subsection A, paragraphs 4 and 5 of this section do not limit eligibility for exemption from taxation under chapter 11, article 3 of this title. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 42-12052, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12052. Review and verification of class three property; civil penalty; appeals A. Each county assessor shall review assessment information, on a continuing basis, to ensure proper classification of residential dwellings. The assessor may enter into intergovernmental agreements with the department for an exchange of information to ensure a coordinated and comprehensive review and identification of property that may be rented while classified as class three pursuant to section 42-12003. B. If the assessor has reason to believe that a parcel of property that is classified as class three pursuant to section 42-12003 is not the owner's primary residence or as a qualifying family member member's residence pursuant to section 42-12053, the assessor shall notify the owner, in a form prescribed by the department as provided by subsection D of this section, and request that the owner respond as to whether the property meets the requirements of section 42-12003 or 42-12053, is a secondary residence or is used as a rental property.  If the owner fails to respond to the assessor within thirty days after the notice is mailed, the assessor shall mail the owner a final notice within thirty days requesting that the owner provide information as to whether the property meets the requirements of a primary residence, a secondary residence or is used as a rental property. If the owner fails to respond to the assessor within fifteen days after the final notice is mailed, the assessor shall: 1. Reclassify the property as class one pursuant to section 42-12001, paragraph 15 or class four pursuant to section 42-12004. In addition to other appeal procedures provided by law, the owner of the property that is reclassified as class four under this paragraph may appeal the reclassification to the county board of supervisors within thirty days after the notice of classification is mailed. If the owner proves to the board's satisfaction that the property is occupied as the owner's primary residence, the board shall order the property to be reclassified as class three property pursuant to section 42-12003. 2. Notify the county treasurer, who shall assess a civil penalty against the property equal to the amount of additional state aid paid pursuant to section 15-972 with respect to the property in the preceding tax year. The civil penalty shall not be assessed if the ownership of the property has changed after notification.  The owner of the property shall pay a penalty under this paragraph to the county treasurer within thirty days after the notice of the penalty is mailed.  The owner may appeal the penalty to the county board of supervisors within the time required for payment. If the owner proves to the board's satisfaction that the property is occupied by the owner, the board shall waive the penalty, and the property shall be listed as class three pursuant to section 42-12003. Until paid or waived, the penalty constitutes a lien against the property. The county treasurer shall deposit all revenue received from penalties assessed under this paragraph in the county general fund. C. Beginning in 2013 and during each elective term of office thereafter, the county assessor shall send notices under subsection B of this section to each owner of property classified as class three pursuant to section 42-12003 described by any of the following: 1. The owner has a mailing address outside the county in which the property is located. 2. The owner has a mailing address, other than a post office box, that is different than the situs address of the property. 3. The owner has the same mailing address listed for more than one parcel of class three property in this state. 4. The owner appears to be a business entity. D. The department shall: 1. Prescribe all forms used to notify property owners under this section. The forms shall contain information as to criteria for the reclassification of property and the civil penalties that may result if the owner fails to respond to the notice. 2. Monitor and review the procedures and practices used by assessors and treasurers to accomplish the verification of class three property and the assessment and collection of penalties prescribed by this section and propose suggested improvements to establish uniform processes and performance among the counties. E. The department may inspect the records of county assessors and county treasurers to determine compliance with the requirements of this section and the accuracy of the classification of owner-occupied residential property and rental property. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 42-12053, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12053. Criteria for distinguishing primary residential property, secondary residential property and rental property A. For the purpose of classifying residential property under sections 42-12003, 42-12004 and 42-12052, a parcel is not considered a secondary property or rental property if the property is occupied by a member of the owner's family, who must be: 1. The owner's natural or adopted child or a descendant of the owner's child. 2. The owner's parent or an ancestor of the owner's parent. 3. The owner's stepchild or stepparent. 4. The owner's child-in-law or parent-in-law. 5. The owner's natural or adopted sibling. B. For the purpose of classifying owner-occupied residential property under sections 42-12003, 42-12004 and 42-12052, the department shall adopt standard criteria for use in determining whether the property is considered to be the owner's or relative's primary residence, including: 1. The period of occupancy each year. 2. The owner's registered voting precinct. 3. The owner's driver license address. 4. The registration address of the owner's motor vehicles. 5. Other appropriate indicators of primary residency. C. For the purpose of classifying residential property that is rented to lodgers for periods of less than thirty days under sections 42-12001, 42-12004 and 42-12052, the department shall adopt standard criteria to determine whether the property is considered to be rented to lodgers for periods of less than thirty days for more than one hundred eighty days in a calendar year, including: 1. The period of occupancy each year. 2. The duration of the rental periods. 3. If the owner appears to be a business entity. 4. If the owner obtained a transaction privilege tax license for the property.  END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Applicability This act applies to tax years beginning from and after December 31, 2026.